Utah statutes.
13-38-102.   Private action.
(1)  A person may bring an action in any state court of competent jurisdiction
against a person that violates any of the requirements of this chapter.
(2)  In an action under Subsection (1), a person may:
(a)  recover the amount of any actual damages caused by the violation of this
chapter;
(b)  recover court costs and reasonable attorney fees as determined by the
court; and
(c)  seek to enjoin conduct in violation of this chapter.
